Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 1. General Provisions

38-39-100.5.
Definitions.

The definitions in section 38-38-100.3 apply to this article unless the context otherwise requires.

History.

Source:
L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1845, § 24, effective January 1, 2008.

38-39-101.
Effect of deed of trust to private trustee - nature of obligation secured.

Any deed of trust that names any person other than a public trustee as trustee therein or that secures an obligation other than an evidence of debt shall be deemed and taken to be a mortgage for all purposes and foreclosed only as mortgages are foreclosed in and through the courts; except that any deed of trust that names a public trustee as trustee therein and secures an obligation other than an instrument evidencing a debt shall be released as provided in section 38-39-102 (5).

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1675, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-37-101, as it existed prior to 1990.

38-39-102.
When deed of trust shall be released - definitions.

of subsection (3) of this section, a deed of trust to the public trustee, upon compliance with the provisions of the deed of trust, shall be released by the public trustee upon the:

Receipt of a written request from the holder of the evidence of debt secured by the deed of trust, the holder’s agent or attorney, or a title insurance company providing an indemnification agreement and affidavit described in paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of this section, which request shall be duly executed and acknowledged;

Production of the original canceled evidence of debt such as a note or bond as evidence that the indebtedness secured by such deed of trust has been paid; except that such production may be omitted in the circumstances contemplated in subsection (3) of this section;

Receipt by the public trustee of the fee prescribed by section 38-37-104 (1)(a) and the fee for recording the release;

Receipt by the public trustee of a current address for the original grantor, assuming party, or current owner or either a notation on the request for release of the deed of trust or a written statement from the holder of the evidence of debt secured by the deed of trust, the title insurance company licensed and qualified in Colorado, or the holder of the original evidence of debt that is a qualified holder, as defined in section 38-38-100.3 (20), that they have no record of a current address that is different from the address of the property encumbered by the deed of trust being released; except that it shall be within the public trustee’s discretion to release a deed of trust, upon compliance with the provisions of the deed of trust, if the public trustee has not received the information required pursuant to this subparagraph (IV); and

Production of the original recorded deed of trust securing the evidence of debt or a legible copy thereof.

Immediately upon execution of the release of the deed of trust by the public trustee, the public trustee shall cause the release to be recorded in the records of the county clerk and recorder.

If the purpose of the deed of trust has been fully or partially satisfied and the indebtedness secured by such deed of trust has not been paid, the public trustee shall release the deed of trust as to all or portions of the property encumbered by the deed of trust pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section if the request to release certifies that the purpose of the deed of trust has been fully or partially satisfied and if either the original evidence of debt is exhibited or the holder of the evidence of debt is a qualified holder.

is limited to actual economic loss suffered and any court costs and reasonable attorney fees and costs incurred in defending a claim brought as a direct and proximate result of the failure to produce the original evidence of debt, but the indemnity does not include and no claimant is entitled to any special, incidental, consequential, reliance, expectation, or punitive damages. No separate indemnification agreement shall be necessary for the agreement to indemnify to be effective.

(II)

A holder of the original evidence of debt that is a qualified holder, as defined in section 38-38-100.3 (20), shall provide the public trustee with a current address for the original grantor, assuming party, or current owner when requesting a release of a deed of trust pursuant to this paragraph (a).

Subject to the provisions of subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (b), with respect to either subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the holder of the evidence of debt may request the release of a deed of trust without producing or exhibiting the original evidence of debt. A holder that requests the release of a deed of trust pursuant to this paragraph (b) shall deliver to the public trustee a corporate surety bond in an amount equal to one and one-half times the original principal amount recited in the deed of trust, which corporate surety bond shall remain in full force and effect for the period described in subsection (7) of this section.

A holder of the evidence of debt shall provide the public trustee with a current address for the original grantor, assuming party, or current owner when requesting a release of a deed of trust pursuant to this paragraph (b).

Subject to the provisions of subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (c), with respect to either subsection (1) or (2) of this section, a title insurance company licensed and qualified in Colorado may request the release of a deed of trust without producing or exhibiting the original evidence of debt. A company that requests the release of a deed of trust pursuant to this paragraph (c) shall be deemed to have agreed to indemnify and defend the public trustee against any claim made within the period described in subsection (7) of this section for damages resulting from the action taken by the public trustee in accordance with the request. The indemnity granted by this paragraph (c) is limited to actual economic loss suffered and any court costs and reasonable attorney fees and costs incurred in defending a claim brought as a direct and proximate result of the failure to produce the original evidence of debt, but the indemnity does not include and no claimant is entitled to any special, incidental, consequential, reliance, expectation, or punitive damages. No separate indemnification agreement shall be necessary for the agreement to indemnify to be effective; however, the company shall provide to the public trustee an affidavit executed by an officer of the company stating that the company has caused the indebtedness secured by the deed of trust to be satisfied in full or, in the case of a partial release, to the extent required by the holder of the indebtedness.

A title insurance company licensed and qualified in Colorado shall provide the public trustee with a current address for the original grantor, assuming party, or current owner when requesting a release of a deed of trust pursuant to this paragraph (c).

(3.5) Venue for any action based upon the indemnification agreement specified in paragraph

of subsection (3) of this section shall be proper only in the county in which the public trustee receiving the certification is located.

A public trustee shall have no duty to retain the original canceled evidence of debt or deed of trust upon a release granted pursuant to this section.

The lien represented by a deed of trust to the public trustee that secures an obligation other than an evidence of debt shall be released by the public trustee pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section as to all or portions of the property encumbered by the deed of trust upon the:

Receipt of a written request of the beneficiary or assignee of such deed of trust, which request shall be duly executed and acknowledged;

Presentation to the public trustee of an affidavit of such beneficiary or assignee stating that the purpose of the deed of trust has been fully or partially satisfied; and

Receipt by the public trustee of the fee prescribed by section 38-37-104 (1)(a) and the fee for recording the release.

The public trustee shall have no liability to any person, and no action may be commenced against the public trustee, as a result of issuing a release or partial release of a deed of trust under subsection (3) of this section, unless such action is commenced within six years from the date of the recording of such release or partial release or within the period of time prescribed by any statute of limitation of this state in which a suit to enforce payment of the indebtedness or performance of the obligation secured by said deed of trust may be commenced, whichever is less. Nothing in this article shall be construed to waive immunity of a public trustee that is provided in sections 24-10-101 to 24-10-120, C.R.S.

The indemnification agreements or the corporate surety bond described in this section shall, in each case, remain effective for the time period described in subsection (6) of this section or until such time as any claim made against the public trustee within such time period has been finally resolved, whichever is longer.

If the written request to release the lien of any deed of trust is a fraudulent request, the release by the public trustee based upon such request shall be void.

(8.5)

If a deed of trust is improperly recorded in the office of the clerk and recorder of a county other than the county in which the real property is located, the deed of trust must be recorded in the correct county before the public trustee may release the deed of trust. The public trustee of a county other than the county wherein the real property is located shall not release the deed of trust.

For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Assuming party” means a person other than the original grantor who paid off the indebtedness on behalf of the original grantor.

“Current address” means the most recent address reflected in the records of a holder of the evidence of debt, a title insurance company licensed and qualified in Colorado, or a holder of the original evidence of debt that is a qualified holder, as defined in section 38-38-100.3 (20). If a holder of the evidence of debt, a title insurance company licensed and qualified in Colorado, or a holder of the original evidence of debt that is a qualified holder, as defined in section 38-38-100.3 (20), has no record of a current address, any requirement that a current address be provided shall be deemed satisfied by indicating that fact.

“Current owner” means a person other than the original grantor who currently owns the property and has either paid off or taken over the indebtedness on behalf of the original grantor.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1675, § 3, effective October 1.

L. 92:

(1) to (3) and (5) amended and (6) to (8) added, p. 2093, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1)(a)(I) amended, p. 254, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1)(a), (2), (6), and (7) amended and (3.5) added, p. 1420, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2000:

IP(3.5)(b)(IV) and (3.5)(b)(V) amended, p. 1874, § 113, effective August 2.

L. 2002:

(3)(c) amended, p. 1348, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(3)(a), (3.5)(b)(I), and (3.5)(b)(II) amended, p. 1212, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1), (2), (3), (3.5), and IP(5) amended, p. 1845, § 25, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2008:

(1)(a), (2), and (3) amended and (9) added, p. 566, § 1, effective April 21.

L. 2009:

(1)(a)(III) and (1)(a)(IV) amended and (1)(a)(V) added,(HB 09-1207), ch. 164, p. 721, § 21, effective September 1.

L. 2012:

(8.5) added,(SB 12-030), ch. 96, p. 325, § 13, effective September 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-37-123, as it existed prior to 1990.

38-39-103.
Effect of release or partial release before maturity of evidence of debt - release is good as to recitals.

In any executed and recorded release or partial release of any deed of trust affecting the title to real estate in this state, whether or not such release is executed before the maturity of the indebtedness so secured, the recital of the following shall constitute evidence thereof, so as to give full effect to such release:

That the indebtedness secured by such deed of trust has been fully or partially paid; or

That the purpose of the deed of trust has been fully or partially satisfied.

Any release of deed of trust shall be good and valid as to the recitals therein, whether made to the original grantor of said deed of trust or to a subsequent purchaser of the property described in such release of deed of trust.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1676, § 3, effective October 1.

L. 92:

(1) amended, p. 2095, § 6, effective July 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former §§ 38-37-124 and 38-37-125, as they existed prior to 1990.

38-39-104.
Satisfaction of mortgage.

The lien of any mortgage encumbering property within the state of Colorado can be released only by the mortgagee executing a separate instrument of release executed under the formalities prescribed by the law regulating conveyances. All releases made prior to July 1, 1973, either on the mortgage or on the record of the mortgage, and signed by the mortgagee, shall have the same effect as a separate instrument of release legally executed by the mortgagee.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1676, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-38-101, as it existed prior to 1990.

38-39-105.
Removal of improvements from encumbered property.

An owner of real property shall not remove any improvement therefrom without first obtaining the written consent of the holder of any lien recorded prior to October 1, 1990, and the holder of the indebtedness secured by the deed of trust or mortgage having the most senior lien which encumbers such real property. This section shall not apply where any such improvement is expressly excepted from such lien.

[Editor’s note: This version of subsection (2) is effective until March 1, 2022.] Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (1) of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

(2)

[

Editor’s note: This version of subsection (2) is effective March 1, 2022.

]

Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (1) of this section commits:

A petty offense if the amount is less than three hundred dollars;

A class 2 misdemeanor if the amount is three hundred dollars or more but less than one thousand dollars;

A class 1 misdemeanor if the amount is one thousand dollars or more but less than two thousand dollars;

A class 6 felony if the amount is more than two thousand dollars but less than five thousand dollars;

A class 5 felony if the amount is five thousand dollars or more but less than twenty thousand dollars;

A class 4 felony if the amount is twenty thousand dollars or more but less than one hundred thousand dollars;

A class 3 felony if the amount is one hundred thousand dollars or more but less than one million dollars; and

A class 2 felony if the amount is one million dollars or more.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1676, § 3, effective October 1.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 1555, § 344, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(2) amended,(SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3293, § 687, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor’s note:

(1) This section is similar to former §§ 38-38-103 and 38-38-104, as they existed prior to 1990.

(2) Section 803(2) of chapter 462 (SB 21-271), Session Laws of Colorado 2021, provides that the act changing this section applies to offenses committed on or after March 1, 2022.

38-39-106.
Future advances.

Any mortgage may, by its terms, secure future advances up to a total maximum principal amount expressly set forth in such mortgage. Such mortgage shall be effective to secure payment of all advances, both obligatory and optional, up to the stated maximum principal amount to the same extent and with the same effect and priority as if such total maximum principal amount had been fully disbursed on or before the date such mortgage was recorded.

Such mortgage shall also secure, to the same extent and with the same effect and priority, the following additional amounts regardless of whether such additional amounts, when added to the principal amount of the indebtedness, exceed the maximum principal amount stated in the mortgage:

All increases in the principal amount that result from negative amortization or the addition of deferred interest;

All disbursements made for the payment of taxes, levies, or insurance with respect to the property subject to the mortgage or made to protect such property from waste, damage, or abuse;

If the mortgage or evidence of debt secured by the mortgage so provides, all reasonable expenses associated with collection of the indebtedness or foreclosure of the mortgage; and

Interest on any of the items specified in paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection (2) in accordance with the terms of the mortgage or the evidence of debt secured by the mortgage.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to any subsequent advance against a mortgage instrument after a mortgagee has initially advanced principal up to the maximum amount stated in the mortgage, unless the mortgage instrument clearly states that it was made pursuant to a revolving credit arrangement.

This section shall have no application to the priority of general mechanics’ liens arising pursuant to article 22 of this title, and the priority of such general mechanics’ liens with respect to a mortgage which secures future advances shall be determined without reference to this section.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, “mortgage” means a mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument creating a lien on real property to secure the payment of an indebtedness.

History.

Source:
L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 377, § 1, effective August 7.

38-39-107.
Form of written request for release of a deed of trust with production of the evidence of debt.

[Form Excluded]

History.

Source:
L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 403, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 569, § 2, effective April 21.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1207), ch. 164, p. 722, § 22, effective September 1.

38-39-108.
Form of written request for release of a deed of trust without production of the evidence of debt.

[Form Excluded]

History.

Source:
L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 405, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 570, § 3, effective April 21.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1207), ch. 164, p. 724, § 23, effective September 1.

38-39-109.
When release of deed of trust is recorded.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), when a release of a deed of trust is presented to the county clerk and recorder for recording, the county clerk and recorder shall return the original release of a deed of trust to the original grantor, assuming party, or current owner using the current address for the original grantor, assuming party, or current owner provided to the public trustee pursuant to section 38-39-102 (1)(a)(IV), (3)(a)(II), (3)(b)(II), or (3)(c)(II).

The county clerk and recorder shall not be required to return the original release of a deed of trust as specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) if the public trustee, in his or her discretion, has released the deed of trust as specified in section 38-39-102 (1)(a)(IV), if a current address is not provided as specified in section 38-39-102 (9)(b), or if the release of deed of trust is electronically recorded.

If the original release is returned to the county clerk and recorder as undeliverable or unable to forward, the county clerk and recorder shall maintain the original release pursuant to the policy of the office of the clerk and recorder.

Any original grantor, assuming party, or current owner seeking a copy of a release of a deed of trust after recording shall be subject to appropriate copy fees pursuant to section 30-1-103, C.R.S.

History.

Source:
L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 573, § 4, effective April 21.

L. 2010:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2121, § 173, effective August 11.

L. 2014:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 14-1073), ch. 30, p. 178, § 9, effective July 1.